dictionaries/sr/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1559 Y 28
SFX 1559 psti psti
SFX 1559 psti bem
SFX 1559 psti beš
SFX 1559 psti be
SFX 1559 psti bemo
SFX 1559 psti bete
SFX 1559 psti be
SFX 1559 psti beo
SFX 1559 psti bela
SFX 1559 psti belo
SFX 1559 psti beli
SFX 1559 psti bele
SFX 1559 psti beću
SFX 1559 psti bećeš
SFX 1559 psti beće
SFX 1559 psti bećemo
SFX 1559 psti bećete
SFX 1559 psti beće
SFX 1559 psti bi
SFX 1559 psti bimo
SFX 1559 psti bite
SFX 1559 psti beh
SFX 1559 psti be
SFX 1559 psti beše
SFX 1559 psti besmo
SFX 1559 psti beste
SFX 1559 psti bljahu
SFX 1559 psti beći

SFX 1560 Y 36
SFX 1560 hati hati
SFX 1560 hati ham
SFX 1560 hati haš
SFX 1560 hati ha
SFX 1560 hati hamo
SFX 1560 hati hate
SFX 1560 hati haju
SFX 1560 hati šem
SFX 1560 hati šeš
SFX 1560 hati še
SFX 1560 hati šemo
SFX 1560 hati šete
SFX 1560 hati haju
SFX 1560 hati hao
SFX 1560 hati hala
SFX 1560 hati halo
SFX 1560 hati hali
SFX 1560 hati hale
SFX 1560 hati haću
SFX 1560 hati haćeš
SFX 1560 hati haće
SFX 1560 hati haćemo
SFX 1560 hati haćete
SFX 1560 hati haće
SFX 1560 hati haj
SFX 1560 hati hajmo
SFX 1560 hati hajte
SFX 1560 hati ši
SFX 1560 hati šimo
SFX 1560 hati šite
SFX 1560 hati hah
SFX 1560 hati haše
SFX 1560 hati hasmo
SFX 1560 hati haste
SFX 1560 hati hahu
SFX 1560 hati hajući

SFX 1561 Y 28
SFX 1561 sati sati
SFX 1561 sati šem
SFX 1561 sati šeš
SFX 1561 sati še
SFX 1561 sati šemo
SFX 1561 sati šete
SFX 1561 sati šu
SFX 1561 sati sao
SFX 1561 sati sala
SFX 1561 sati salo
SFX 1561 sati sali
SFX 1561 sati sale
SFX 1561 sati saću
SFX 1561 sati saćeš
SFX 1561 sati saće
SFX 1561 sati saćemo
SFX 1561 sati saćete
SFX 1561 sati saće
SFX 1561 sati ši
SFX 1561 sati šimo
SFX 1561 sati šite
SFX 1561 sati sah
SFX 1561 sati saše
SFX 1561 sati sasmo
SFX 1561 sati saste
SFX 1561 sati sahu
SFX 1561 sati šući
SFX 1561 sati savši

SFX 1562 Y 27
SFX 1562 kati kati
SFX 1562 kati ćem
SFX 1562 kati ćeš
SFX 1562 kati će
SFX 1562 kati ćemo
SFX 1562 kati ćete
SFX 1562 kati ću
SFX 1562 kati kao
SFX 1562 kati kala
SFX 1562 kati kalo
SFX 1562 kati kali
SFX 1562 kati kale
SFX 1562 kati kaću
SFX 1562 kati kaćeš
SFX 1562 kati kaće
SFX 1562 kati kaćemo
SFX 1562 kati kaćete
SFX 1562 kati kaće
SFX 1562 kati ći
SFX 1562 kati ćimo
SFX 1562 kati ćite
SFX 1562 kati kah
SFX 1562 kati kaše
SFX 1562 kati kasmo
SFX 1562 kati kaste
SFX 1562 kati kahu
SFX 1562 kati ćući

SFX 1563 Y 27
SFX 1563 eti eti
SFX 1563 eti anjem
SFX 1563 eti anješ
SFX 1563 eti anje
SFX 1563 eti anjemo
SFX 1563 eti anjete
SFX 1563 eti anju
SFX 1563 eti eo
SFX 1563 eti ela
SFX 1563 eti elo
SFX 1563 eti eli
SFX 1563 eti ele
SFX 1563 eti eću
SFX 1563 eti ećeš
SFX 1563 eti eće
SFX 1563 eti ećemo
SFX 1563 eti ećete
SFX 1563 eti eće
SFX 1563 eti nji
SFX 1563 eti njimo
SFX 1563 eti njite
SFX 1563 eti eh
SFX 1563 eti eše
SFX 1563 eti esmo
SFX 1563 eti este
SFX 1563 eti njahu
SFX 1563 eti eći

SFX 1564 Y 28
SFX 1564 ći ći
SFX 1564 ći žem
SFX 1564 ći žeš
SFX 1564 ći že
SFX 1564 ći žemo
SFX 1564 ći žete
SFX 1564 ći žu
SFX 1564 ći gao
SFX 1564 ći gla
SFX 1564 ći glo
SFX 1564 ći gli
SFX 1564 ći gle
SFX 1564 ći gnuću
SFX 1564 ći gnućeš
SFX 1564 ći gnuće
SFX 1564 ći gnućemo
SFX 1564 ći gnućete
SFX 1564 ći gnuće
SFX 1564 ći gni
SFX 1564 ći gnimo
SFX 1564 ći gnite
SFX 1564 ći goh
SFX 1564 ći že
SFX 1564 ći goše
SFX 1564 ći gosmo
SFX 1564 ći goste
SFX 1564 ći gohu
SFX 1564 ći ći

SFX 1565 Y 36
SFX 1565 kati kati
SFX 1565 kati čem
SFX 1565 kati češ
SFX 1565 kati če
SFX 1565 kati čemo
SFX 1565 kati čete
SFX 1565 kati ču
SFX 1565 kati kam
SFX 1565 kati kaš
SFX 1565 kati ka
SFX 1565 kati kamo
SFX 1565 kati kate
SFX 1565 kati kaju
SFX 1565 kati kao
SFX 1565 kati kala
SFX 1565 kati kalo
SFX 1565 kati kali
SFX 1565 kati kale
SFX 1565 kati kaću
SFX 1565 kati kaćeš
SFX 1565 kati kaće
SFX 1565 kati kaćemo
SFX 1565 kati kaćete
SFX 1565 kati kaće
SFX 1565 kati či
SFX 1565 kati čimo
SFX 1565 kati čite
SFX 1565 kati kaj
SFX 1565 kati kajmo
SFX 1565 kati kajte
SFX 1565 kati kah
SFX 1565 kati kaše
SFX 1565 kati kasmo
SFX 1565 kati kaste
SFX 1565 kati kahu
SFX 1565 kati čući

SFX 1566 Y 36
SFX 1566 njeti njeti
SFX 1566 njeti njem
SFX 1566 njeti nješ
SFX 1566 njeti nje
SFX 1566 njeti njemo
SFX 1566 njeti njete
SFX 1566 njeti nju
SFX 1566 njeti anjem
SFX 1566 njeti anješ
SFX 1566 njeti anje
SFX 1566 njeti anjemo
SFX 1566 njeti anjete
SFX 1566 njeti anju
SFX 1566 njeti nio
SFX 1566 njeti njela
SFX 1566 njeti njelo
SFX 1566 njeti njeli
SFX 1566 njeti njele
SFX 1566 njeti njeću
SFX 1566 njeti njećeš
SFX 1566 njeti njeće
SFX 1566 njeti njećemo
SFX 1566 njeti njećete
SFX 1566 njeti njeće
SFX 1566 njeti nji
SFX 1566 njeti njimo
SFX 1566 njeti njite
SFX 1566 njeti anji
SFX 1566 njeti anjimo
SFX 1566 njeti anjite
SFX 1566 njeti njeh
SFX 1566 njeti nješe
SFX 1566 njeti njesmo
SFX 1566 njeti njeste
SFX 1566 njeti njahu
SFX 1566 njeti anjući

SFX 1567 Y 27
SFX 1567 teti teti
SFX 1567 teti tim
SFX 1567 teti tiš
SFX 1567 teti ti
SFX 1567 teti timo
SFX 1567 teti tite
SFX 1567 teti te
SFX 1567 teti teo
SFX 1567 teti tela
SFX 1567 teti telo
SFX 1567 teti teli
SFX 1567 teti tele
SFX 1567 teti teću
SFX 1567 teti tećeš
SFX 1567 teti teće
SFX 1567 teti tećemo
SFX 1567 teti tećete
SFX 1567 teti teće
SFX 1567 teti ti
SFX 1567 teti timo
SFX 1567 teti tite
SFX 1567 teti teh
SFX 1567 teti teše
SFX 1567 teti tesmo
SFX 1567 teti teste
SFX 1567 teti ćahu
SFX 1567 teti teći

SFX 1568 Y 29
SFX 1568 nuti nuti
SFX 1568 nuti nem
SFX 1568 nuti neš
SFX 1568 nuti ne
SFX 1568 nuti nemo
SFX 1568 nuti nete
SFX 1568 nuti nu
SFX 1568 nuti nuo
SFX 1568 nuti nula
SFX 1568 nuti nulo
SFX 1568 nuti nuli
SFX 1568 nuti nule
SFX 1568 nuti nuću
SFX 1568 nuti nućeš
SFX 1568 nuti nuće
SFX 1568 nuti nućemo
SFX 1568 nuti nućete
SFX 1568 nuti nuće
SFX 1568 nuti ni
SFX 1568 nuti nimo
SFX 1568 nuti nite
SFX 1568 nuti nuh
SFX 1568 nuti nu
SFX 1568 nuti nuše
SFX 1568 nuti nusmo
SFX 1568 nuti nuste
SFX 1568 nuti njahu
SFX 1568 nuti neći
SFX 1568 nuti nuvši

SFX 1569 Y 28
SFX 1569 sneti sneti
SFX 1569 sneti snim
SFX 1569 sneti sniš
SFX 1569 sneti sni
SFX 1569 sneti snimo
SFX 1569 sneti snite
SFX 1569 sneti sne
SFX 1569 sneti sneo
SFX 1569 sneti snela
SFX 1569 sneti snelo
SFX 1569 sneti sneli
SFX 1569 sneti snele
SFX 1569 sneti sneću
SFX 1569 sneti snećeš
SFX 1569 sneti sneće
SFX 1569 sneti snećemo
SFX 1569 sneti snećete
SFX 1569 sneti sneće
SFX 1569 sneti sni
SFX 1569 sneti snimo
SFX 1569 sneti snite
SFX 1569 sneti sneh
SFX 1569 sneti sne
SFX 1569 sneti sneše
SFX 1569 sneti snesmo
SFX 1569 sneti sneste
SFX 1569 sneti šnjahu
SFX 1569 sneti snevši

SFX 1570 Y 28
SFX 1570 snjeti snjeti
SFX 1570 snjeti snim
SFX 1570 snjeti sniš
SFX 1570 snjeti sni
SFX 1570 snjeti snimo
SFX 1570 snjeti snite
SFX 1570 snjeti sne
SFX 1570 snjeti snio
SFX 1570 snjeti snjela
SFX 1570 snjeti snjelo
SFX 1570 snjeti snjeli
SFX 1570 snjeti snjele
SFX 1570 snjeti snjeću
SFX 1570 snjeti snjećeš
SFX 1570 snjeti snjeće
SFX 1570 snjeti snjećemo
SFX 1570 snjeti snjećete
SFX 1570 snjeti snjeće
SFX 1570 snjeti sni
SFX 1570 snjeti snimo
SFX 1570 snjeti snite
SFX 1570 snjeti snjeh
SFX 1570 snjeti snje
SFX 1570 snjeti snješe
SFX 1570 snjeti snjesmo
SFX 1570 snjeti snjeste
SFX 1570 snjeti šnjahu
SFX 1570 snjeti snjevši

SFX 1571 Y 28
SFX 1571 ati ati
SFX 1571 ati im
SFX 1571 ati iš
SFX 1571 ati i
SFX 1571 ati imo
SFX 1571 ati ite
SFX 1571 ati i
SFX 1571 ati ao
SFX 1571 ati ala
SFX 1571 ati alo
SFX 1571 ati ali
SFX 1571 ati ale
SFX 1571 ati aću
SFX 1571 ati aćeš
SFX 1571 ati aće
SFX 1571 ati aćemo
SFX 1571 ati aćete
SFX 1571 ati aće
SFX 1571 ati i
SFX 1571 ati imo
SFX 1571 ati ite
SFX 1571 ati ah
SFX 1571 ati a
SFX 1571 ati aše
SFX 1571 ati asmo
SFX 1571 ati aste
SFX 1571 ati ahu
SFX 1571 ati avši
