dictionaries/sr/sr-Latn.dic
dupsti/1559
duhati/1560
ejakulisati/1561
žvakati/1562
žeti/1563
žeći/1564
žmikati/1565
žnjeti/1566
žuteti/1567
žutnuti/1568
zabesneti/1569
zabjesnjeti/1570
zablejati/1571
zviždukati/1562
zrikati/1565
izbesneti/1569
izbjesnjeti/1570
izblejati/1571
leteti/1567
obliterisati/1561
pobesneti/1569
pobijesneti/1569
pobjesneti/1569
pobjesnjeti/1570
problejati/1571
puhati/1560
razbesneti/1569
razbjesneti/1569
razbjesnjeti/1570
tikati/1565
ćuteti/1567
uzbesneti/1569
uzbjesnjeti/1570
šuteti/1567
